Washington statutes.
RCW 19.28.101

Inspections—Notice to repair and change—Disconnection—Entry—Concealment—Accessibility—Connection to utility—Permits, fees—Limitation—Waiver of provisions during state of emergency.

(1) The director shall cause an inspector to inspect all wiring, appliances, devices, and equipment to which this chapter applies except for basic electrical work as defined in this chapter. The department may not require an electrical work permit for class A basic electrical work unless deficiencies in the installation or repair require inspection. The department may inspect class B basic electrical work on a random basis as specified by the department in rule. Nothing contained in this chapter may be construed as providing any authority for any subdivision of government to adopt by ordinance any provisions contained or provided for in this chapter except those pertaining to cities and towns pursuant to RCW 19.28.010(3).

(2) Upon request, electrical inspections will be made by the department within forty-eight hours, excluding holidays, Saturdays, and Sundays. If, upon written request, the electrical inspector fails to make an electrical inspection within twenty-four hours, the serving utility may immediately connect electrical power to the installation if the necessary electrical work permit is displayed: PROVIDED, That if the request is for an electrical inspection that relates to a mobile home installation, the applicant shall provide proof of a current building permit issued by the local government agency authorized to issue such permits as a prerequisite for inspection approval or connection of electrical power to the mobile home.

(3) Whenever the installation of any wiring, device, appliance, or equipment is not in accordance with this chapter, or is in such a condition as to be dangerous to life or property, the person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity owning, using, or operating it shall be notified by the department and shall within fifteen days, or such further reasonable time as may upon request be granted, make such repairs and changes as are required to remove the danger to life or property and to make it conform to this chapter. The director, through the inspector, is hereby empowered to disconnect or order the discontinuance of electrical service to conductors or equipment that are found to be in a dangerous or unsafe condition and not in accordance with this chapter. Upon making a disconnection the inspector shall attach a notice stating that the conductors have been found dangerous to life or property and are not in accordance with this chapter. It is unlawful for any person to reconnect such defective conductors or equipment without the approval of the department, and until the conductors and equipment have been placed in a safe and secure condition, and in a condition that complies with this chapter.

(4) The director, through the electrical inspector, has the right during reasonable hours to enter into and upon any building or premises in the discharge of his or her official duties for the purpose of making any inspection or test of the installation of new construction or altered electrical wiring, electrical devices, equipment, or material contained in or on the buildings or premises. No electrical wiring or equipment subject to this chapter may be concealed until it has been approved by the inspector making the inspection. At the time of the inspection, electrical wiring or equipment subject to this chapter must be sufficiently accessible to permit the inspector to employ any testing methods that will verify conformance with the national electrical code and any other requirements of this chapter.

(5) Persons, firms, partnerships, corporations, or other entities making electrical installations shall obtain inspection and approval from an authorized representative of the department as required by this chapter before requesting the electric utility to connect to the installations. Electric utilities may connect to the installations if approval is clearly indicated by certification of the electrical work permit required to be affixed to each installation or by equivalent means, except that increased or relocated services may be reconnected immediately at the discretion of the utility before approval if an electrical work permit is displayed. The permits shall be furnished upon payment of the fee to the department.

(6) The director, subject to the recommendations and approval of the board, shall set by rule a schedule of license and electrical work permit fees that will cover the costs of administration and enforcement of this chapter. The rules shall be adopted in accordance with the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW. No fee may be charged for plug-in mobile homes, recreational vehicles, or portable appliances.

(7) Nothing in this chapter shall authorize the inspection of any wiring, appliance, device, or equipment, or installations thereof, by any utility or by any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity employed by a utility in connection with the installation, repair, or maintenance of lines, wires, apparatus, or equipment owned by or under the control of the utility. All work covered by the national electric code not exempted by the 1981 edition of the national electric code 90-2(B)(5) shall be inspected by the department.

(8) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12), the governor may waive or suspend the collection of fees under this section or any portion of this section or under any administrative rule, and issue any orders to facilitate the operation of state or local government or to promote and secure the safety and protection of the civilian population.

[ 2008 c 181 s 201; 2003 c 399 s 201; 1996 c 241 s 4; 1992 c 240 s 2; 1989 c 344 s 1; 1988 c 81 s 7; 1983 c 206 s 7; 1971 ex.s. c 129 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 71 s 4; 1967 c 88 s 3; 1965 ex.s. c 117 s 5; 1963 c 207 s 3; 1959 c 325 s 2; 1935 c 169 s 8; RRS s 8307-8. Formerly RCW 19.28.210, 19.28.220, 19.28.230, 19.28.240.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—2008 c 181: See note following RCW 43.06.220.

Part headings not law—2003 c 399: See note following RCW 19.28.006.

Effective date—1971 ex.s. c 129: See note following RCW 19.28.041.

Adoption of certain regulations proscribed: RCW 36.32.125.

RCW 19.28.101 inapplicable in certain cities, towns, electricity supply agency service areas, and rights-of-way of state highways: RCW 19.28.141.